Maine, session 132, LD1091.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §2608 is enacted to read:
§2608. Public comment at public meetings of municipal officers
A reasonable opportunity for public comment must be provided on matters addressed
by the municipal governing body at any regularly scheduled public meeting of the
municipal officers. This section does not apply to a subcommittee meeting of a municipal
governing body. This section does not preempt or restrict the municipal governing body
from adopting and enforcing reasonable standards governing public comment, including
time limits and conduct standards.
Page 1 - 132LR1413(03)